District of Columbia statutes.
3-2505

Repealed

Licenses — Renewal; fees; suspension or revocation.

Repealed.

June 18, 1898, 30 Stat. 477, ch. 467, § 4
July 14, 1932, 47 Stat. 659, ch. 476, § 4
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title V, § 503, 23 DCR 2461
June 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-14, § 205, 30 DCR 2632
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1237, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-2105.
1973 Ed., § 2-1405.